Utah statutes.
39-1-21.   Adjutant general -- Salary.

The adjutant general shall:

(1)  receive a salary established by the governor within the salary range fixed in Title 67, Chapter 22, State Officer Compensation; and

(2)  devote all of the adjutant general's time during the office hours of the military department to the duties of the office.

